Hawaii statutes.
§664-36 Appeal. Any party aggrieved by
the judgment of the court may appeal therefrom to the intermediate appellate
court, subject to chapter 602, in the manner and within the time provided for
civil appeals from the circuit courts. [L 1886, c 69, §6; am L 1888, c 26, §6;
am L 1907, c 56, §6; RL 1925, §2941; RL 1935, §3682; am L 1939, c 19, §4; RL
1945, §10223; RL 1955, §234-35; HRS §664-36; am L 1972, c 90, §6(q); am L 2004,
c 202, §77; am L 2006, c 94, §1; am L 2010, c 109, §1]

Case Notes

Findings may not be set aside unless clearly erroneous, HRCP
rule 52(a) being applicable. 54 H. 174, 504 P.2d 1330 (1973).

Cases prior to adoption of the Hawaii Rules of Civil
Procedure.

Court authorized on appeal to render such judgment as shall
be just and equitable. 9 H. 651 (1895); 10 H. 174 (1895). Evidence
insufficient. 10 H. 133 (1895); 10 H. 453 (1896). Record. 21 H. 173, 174
(1912).

Findings, weight. 23 H. 595, 601 (1917); 24 H. 47, 53
(1917).

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next